Tennessee, session 114, HB0929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-114(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(9) The funds may be used for the payment of any fines, fees, or penalties
assessed pursuant to this chapter or title 3, chapter 6.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-10-114(b)(2)(J), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0929
002512
- 1 -